Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-553
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-553 to 71-557 shall be known
and may be cited as the Newborn Critical Congenital Heart Disease Screening
Act.

Laws 2013, LB225, § 1.